Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.060

Director's authority—Recordkeeping—Cooperation.

If required to carry out the objectives of this chapter, including the conduct of any investigations or hearing:

(1) The director shall require any person to:

(a) Establish and maintain records;

(b) Make reports; and

(c) Provide other information as may be reasonably required.

(2) Any person subject to the provisions of this chapter shall provide the information, records, and reports reasonably required by the director, or make such material available to the director for inspection and/or copying at reasonable times and places, except that no person shall be required under this section to provide to the director proprietary business or financial records or information.

[ 1989 c 355 s 7.]